Nevada, session 83, AB235.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 247.540 is hereby amended to read as follows:
247.540 1. The following persons may request that the
personal information described in subsection 1, 2 or 3 of NRS
247.520 that is contained in the records of a county recorder be kept
confidential:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master in this State.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(d) Any clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
(e) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged with
the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy appointed
by such county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the elections
division of the county or city.
(f) Any peace officer or retired peace officer.
(g) Any prosecutor.
(h) Any state or county public defender.
(i) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney General
who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of Nevada
or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
(j) Any person, including, without limitation, a social worker,
employed by this State or a political subdivision of this State who as
part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
(k) Any county manager in this State.
(l) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this State
or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possesses specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
(m) Any provider of health care who practices in reproductive
health.
(n) Any employee of or volunteer for a health care facility that
provides services related to reproductive health.
(o) Any provider of gender-affirming care.
(p) The spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a person
described in paragraphs (a) to [(l),] (o), inclusive.
[(n)] (q) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child
of a person described in paragraphs (a) to [(l),] (o), inclusive, who
was killed in the performance of his or her duties.
[(o)] (r) Any person for whom a fictitious address has been
issued pursuant to NRS 217.462 to 217.471, inclusive.
2. Any nonprofit entity in this State that maintains a
confidential location for the purpose of providing shelter to victims
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
of domestic violence may request that the personal information
described in subsection 4 of NRS 247.520 that is contained in the
records of a county recorder be kept confidential.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Gender-affirming care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 603A.435.
(e) “Health care facility” means any facility licensed pursuant
to chapter 449 of NRS.
(f) “Peace officer” means:
(1) Any person upon whom some or all of the powers of a
peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360,
inclusive; and
(2) Any person:
(I) Who resides in this State;
(II) Whose primary duties are to enforce the law; and
(III) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency of
the Federal Government, including, without limitation, a ranger for
the National Park Service and an agent employed by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, Secret Service, United States Department
of Homeland Security or United States Department of the Treasury.
[(e)] (g) “Prosecutor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 241A.030.
[(f)] (h) “Provider of health care” means a person who is
licensed, certified or otherwise authorized by the laws of this State
to administer health care in the ordinary course of business or
practice of a profession.
(i) “Reproductive health” means all health care matters
relating to pregnancy, including, without limitation, prenatal care,
childbirth, postpartum care, birth control, vasectomy, tubal
ligation, abortion, abortion care, management of a miscarriage
and infertility care.
(j) “Social worker” means any person licensed under chapter
641B of NRS.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
Sec. 2. NRS 250.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
250.140 1. The following persons may request that personal
information described in subsection 1, 2 or 3 of NRS 250.120 that is
contained in the records of a county assessor be kept confidential:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master in this State.
(d) Any clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
(e) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged with
the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy appointed
by such county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the elections
division of the county or city.
(f) Any peace officer or retired peace officer.
(g) Any prosecutor.
(h) Any state or county public defender.
(i) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney General
who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of Nevada
or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
(j) Any person, including, without limitation, a social worker,
employed by this State or a political subdivision of this State who as
part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
(k) Any county manager in this State.
(l) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this State
or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possesses specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
(m) Any provider of health care who practices in reproductive
health.
(n) Any employee of or volunteer for a health care facility that
provides services related to reproductive health.
(o) Any provider of gender-affirming care.
(p) The spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a person
described in paragraphs (a) to [(l),] (o), inclusive.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
[(n)] (q) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child
of a person described in paragraphs (a) to [(l),] (o), inclusive, who
was killed in the performance of his or her duties.
[(o)] (r) Any person for whom a fictitious address has been
issued pursuant to NRS 217.462 to 217.471, inclusive.
2. Any nonprofit entity in this State that maintains a
confidential location for the purpose of providing shelter to victims
of domestic violence may request that the personal information
described in subsection 4 of NRS 250.120 that is contained in the
records of a county assessor be kept confidential.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Gender-affirming care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 603A.435.
(e) “Health care facility” means any facility licensed pursuant
to chapter 449 of NRS.
(f) “Peace officer” means:
(1) Any person upon whom some or all of the powers of a
peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360,
inclusive; and
(2) Any person:
(I) Who resides in this State;
(II) Whose primary duties are to enforce the law; and
(III) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency of
the Federal Government, including, without limitation, a ranger for
the National Park Service and an agent employed by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, Secret Service, United States Department
of Homeland Security or United States Department of the Treasury.
[(e)] (g) “Prosecutor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 241A.030.
[(f)] (h) “Provider of health care” means a person who is
licensed, certified or otherwise authorized by the laws of this State
to administer health care in the ordinary course of business or
practice of a profession.
(i) “Reproductive health” means all health care matters
relating to pregnancy, including, without limitation, prenatal care,
childbirth, postpartum care, birth control, vasectomy, tubal
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
ligation, abortion, abortion care, management of a miscarriage
and infertility care.
(j) “Social worker” means any person licensed under chapter
641B of NRS.
Sec. 3. NRS 293.908 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.908 1. The following persons may request that personal
information contained in the records of the Secretary of State or a
county or city clerk be kept confidential:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master in this State.
(d) Any clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
(e) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged with
the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy appointed
by such county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the elections
division of the county or city.
(f) Any peace officer or retired peace officer.
(g) Any prosecutor.
(h) Any state or county public defender.
(i) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney General
who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of Nevada
or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
(j) Any person, including, without limitation, a social worker,
employed by this State or a political subdivision of this State who as
part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
(k) Any county manager in this State.
(l) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this State
or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possess specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
(m) Any provider of health care who practices in reproductive
health.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(n) Any employee of or volunteer for a health care facility that
provides services related to reproductive health.
(o) Any provider of gender-affirming care.
(p) The spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a person
described in paragraphs (a) to [(l),] (o), inclusive.
[(n)] (q) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child
of a person described in paragraphs (a) to [(l),] (o), inclusive, who
was killed in the performance of his or her duties.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Gender-affirming care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 603A.435.
(e) “Health care facility” means any facility licensed pursuant
to chapter 449 of NRS.
(f) “Peace officer” means:
(1) Any person upon whom some or all of the powers of a
peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360,
inclusive; and
(2) Any person:
(I) Who resides in this State;
(II) Whose primary duties are to enforce the law; and
(III) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency of
the Federal Government, including, without limitation, a ranger for
the National Park Service and an agent employed by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, Secret Service, United States Department
of Homeland Security or United States Department of the Treasury.
[(e)] (g) “Prosecutor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 241A.030.
[(f)] (h) “Provider of health care” means a person who is
licensed, certified or otherwise authorized by the laws of this State
to administer health care in the ordinary course of business or
practice of a profession.
(i) “Reproductive health” means all health care matters
relating to pregnancy, including, without limitation, prenatal care,
childbirth, postpartum care, birth control, vasectomy, tubal
ligation, abortion, abortion care, management of a miscarriage
and infertility care.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(j) “Social worker” means any person licensed under chapter
641B of NRS.
Sec. 4. NRS 481.091 is hereby amended to read as follows:
481.091 1. The following persons may request that the
Department display an alternate address on the person’s driver’s
license, commercial driver’s license or identification card:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master in this State.
(d) Any clerk of the court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
(e) Any prosecutor who as part of his or her normal job
responsibilities prosecutes persons for:
(1) Crimes that are punishable as category A felonies; or
(2) Domestic violence.
(f) Any state or county public defender who as part of his or her
normal job responsibilities defends persons for:
(1) Crimes that are punishable as category A felonies; or
(2) Domestic violence.
(g) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney General
who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of Nevada
or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
(h) Any person, including, without limitation, a social worker,
employed by this State or a political subdivision of this State who as
part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
(i) Any county manager in this State.
(j) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this State
or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possesses specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
(k) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged with
the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy appointed
by the county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the elections
division of the county or city.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
(l) Any provider of health care who practices in reproductive
health.
(m) Any employee of or volunteer for a health care facility that
provides services related to reproductive health.
(n) Any provider of gender-affirming care.
(o) The spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a person
described in paragraphs (a) to [(k),] (n), inclusive.
[(m)] (p) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child
of a person described in paragraphs (a) to [(k),] (n), inclusive, who
was killed in the performance of his or her duties.
[(n)] (q) Any person for whom a fictitious address has been
issued pursuant to NRS 217.462 to 217.471, inclusive.
2. A person who wishes to have an alternate address displayed
on his or her driver’s license, commercial driver’s license or
identification card pursuant to this section must submit to the
Department satisfactory proof:
(a) That he or she is a person described in subsection 1; and
(b) Of the person’s address of principal residence and mailing
address, if different from the address of principal residence.
3. A person who obtains a driver’s license, commercial driver’s
license or identification card that displays an alternate address
pursuant to this section may subsequently submit a request to the
Department to have his or her address of principal residence
displayed on his or her driver’s license, commercial driver’s license
or identification card instead of the alternate address.
4. The Department may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Gender-affirming care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 603A.435.
(e) “Health care facility” means any facility licensed pursuant
to chapter 449 of NRS.
(f) “Provider of health care” means a person who is licensed,
certified or otherwise authorized by the laws of this State to
administer health care in the ordinary course of business or
practice of a profession.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
(g) “Reproductive health” means all health care matters
relating to pregnancy, including, without limitation, prenatal care,
childbirth, postpartum care, birth control, vasectomy, tubal
ligation, abortion, abortion care, management of a miscarriage
and infertility care.
(h) “Social worker” means any person licensed under chapter
641B of NRS.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)